Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-505
License; cancellation; grounds; period.

In case of refusal of any person to comply with the order of the Commissioner of Labor or subpoena issued by him, or the refusal of any witness to testify to any matter regarding which he may be lawfully interrogated, or refusal to permit any inspection as aforesaid the commissioner may cancel the license held by such person, firm or corporation refusing to comply with the order of the commissioner. The orders of the commissioner shall be in accord with the provisions of sections 48-503 to 48-524. When such license shall be canceled, it shall not be reissued to such person, firm or corporation for a period of one year or less from the date of cancellation.

Laws 1921, c. 189, § 4, p. 703;

C.S.1922, § 7730;

C.S.1929, § 48-504;

R.S.1943, § 48-505;

Laws 1972, LB 1460, § 4;

Laws 1977, LB 162, § 4.